Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1115
Threat of harm to others, defined.

Threat of harm to others means a significant likelihood of substantial harm to others as evidenced by one or more of the following: Having inflicted or attempted to inflict serious bodily injury on another; having committed an act that would constitute a sexual assault or attempted sexual assault; having committed lewd and lascivious conduct toward a child; having set or attempted to set fire to another person or to any property of another without the owner's consent; or, by the use of an explosive, having damaged or destroyed property, put another person at risk of harm, or injured another person.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 15.